Maine, session 132, LD1412.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3503, sub-§5, ¶C, as amended by PL 1999, c. 398, Pt. A,
§87 and affected by §§104 and 105, is further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to
read:
(3) To provide for a contingency reserve fund, 1/2 of which may be used for capital
purposes, to reflect up to a 25% 35% addition to yearly revenues over the amount
required to operate the utility, not including purchased power supply costs, if any.
The commission may authorize a utility to establish rates to provide for a
contingency reserve fund to reflect an amount greater than a 35% addition to yearly
revenues over the amount required to operate the utility. Any surplus in excess of
this 25% 35% or the percentage authorized by the commission in accordance with
this subparagraph must be used to offset future revenue requirements in the setting
of rates. Any interest generated on these funds must be deposited into the
contingency reserve fund. The balance in the contingency reserve fund at the close
of the utility's fiscal year may not exceed 25% 35% or the percentage authorized
by the commission of the yearly revenues over the amount required to operate the
utility, not including purchased power supply costs, if any; and
Page 1 - 132LR0914(04)